Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201664-310
Notary public's electronic signature and electronic notary seal; use; maintenance of records; notification to Secretary of State of theft or vandalism.

(1) A notary public’s electronic signature in combination with the electronic notary seal shall be used only for the purpose of performing an electronic notarial act.

(2) An electronic notary public shall safeguard his or her electronic signature, electronic notary seal, and all other notarial records. Notarial records shall be maintained by the electronic notary public, and the electronic notary public shall not surrender or destroy the records except as required by a court order or as allowed under rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the Secretary of State.

(3) When not in use, the electronic notary public shall keep his or her electronic signature, electronic notary seal, and all other notarial records secure, under his or her exclusive control, and shall not allow them to be used by any other notary public or any other person.

(4) Within ten days after discovering that his or her electronic notary seal or electronic signature has been stolen, lost, damaged, or otherwise rendered incapable of being attached to or logically associated with an electronic document, an electronic notary public shall notify the Secretary of State and appropriate law enforcement agency in the case of theft or vandalism.

Laws 2016, LB465, § 10.
July 1, 2017